Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 343.261 is amended to read:
343.261. (1) As used in this section, “hospital” means:
(a) A state-operated hospital;
(b) A hospital or clinic of the Oregon Health and Science University; or
(c) A private hospital that is not a psychiatric facility and that:
(A) Has the capacity to admit patients from throughout this state;
(B) Provides specialized intensive treatment for children with severe, low-incidence  types
of disabling conditions; or
(C) Admits children who can  expect to be hospitalized for extended periods of time or
rehospitalized frequently.
(2) Under rules adopted by the State Board of Education:
[(1)] (a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in cooperation with  [the] hospital authorities,
shall be responsible for the payment of  the cost and oversight of the educational programs for
children through 21 years of age in a hospital. [ the following institutions: ]
[(a) State-operated hospitals; ]
[(b) The Oregon Health and Science University hospitals and clinics; and ]
[(c) Private hospitals not including psychiatric facilities which: ]
[(A) Have the capacity to admit patients from throughout the state; ]
[(B) Provide  specialized intensive treatment for children with severe, low-incidence types of disa-
bling conditions; and ]
[(C) Admit children who can expect to be hospitalized for extended periods  of time or rehospital-
ized frequently.]
[(2)] (b) The superintendent shall be  responsible for the payment of the cost of the education
by contract with the school district in which the [ state-operated hospital, the  Oregon Health and
Science University hospital or clinic or the private ] hospital is located. The hospital shall be respon-
sible for the costs of transportation, care, treatment and medical expenses. The  payments may be
made to the school district, or at the discretion of the school district,  to the district providing the
education, as set forth in [ subsection (3) of this section ] paragraph (c) of this subsection , from the
funds appropriated for the purpose.
[(3)] (c) The school district in  which the [ state-operated hospital, the Oregon Health and Science
University hospital or clinic or the private ] hospital is located shall be responsible for providing the
Enrolled House Bill 3063 (HB 3063-INTRO) Page 1
education directly or through an adjacent school district or through  the education service district
in which the program is located or one contiguous [ thereto.] to the school district.
(d) A student who is in a hospital educational program shall continue  to remain enrolled
in the school district in which the student had been a resident prior to being in the  hospital
educational program  only for the purpose of maintaining access to classroom curricula and
associated technology.
[(4)] (e) The superintendent shall make the final determinations concerning  the eligibility of
hospitals to receive state funding under this section.
Passed by House March 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3063 (HB 3063-INTRO) Page 2